District of Columbia statutes.
20-701.01

Personal representative to proceed without court order; exception.

(a)

A personal representative shall proceed expeditiously with the settlement and distribution of a decedent’s estate and, except as may be otherwise specified or ordered by the Court in a particular proceeding, do so without adjudication, order, or direction of the Court, but the personal representative may invoke the jurisdiction of the Court, in proceedings authorized by this title, to resolve questions concerning the estate or its administration.

(b)

Unless the time of distribution is extended by the Court for good cause shown, the supervised personal representative shall distribute all the assets of the estate in such representative’s possession or control within 30 days of the approval of the final account.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(dd), 42 DCR 63
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 19(c), 44 DCR 1271
1981 Ed., § 20-701.1.
For temporary amendment of § 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, see § 2 of the Probate Reform Act of 1994 Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-79, June 28, 1995, 42 DCR 3452).

Application of Law 10-241:

10-241: Section 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, as amended by § 2 of D.C. Law 11-54, provided that the act shall be applicable to estates of decedents who died on or after July 1, 1995.

Section 32(c) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 20-701.1 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 20-701.01.